Utah statutes.
13-32a-108.   Retention of records -- Reasonable inspection.

(1)  The pawnbroker or law enforcement agency, whichever has custody of pawn tickets, shall retain them for no less than three years from the date of the transaction.

(2) (a)  A law enforcement agency may conduct random reasonable inspections of pawn or secondhand businesses for the purpose of monitoring compliance with the reporting requirements of this chapter.  The inspections may be conducted to:

(i)  confirm that pawned or sold items match the description reported to the database by the pawnshop; and

(ii)  make spot checks of property at the pawn or secondhand business to determine if the property is appropriately reported.

(b)  Inspections under Subsection (2)(a) shall be performed during the regular business hours of the pawn or secondhand business.

(3)  A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor and is also subject to civil penalties under Section 13-32a-110.



Amended by Chapter 284, 2012 General Session

